Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.32.032

Party preference.

The voters' pamphlet must also contain the political party preference or independent status where a candidate appearing on the ballot has expressed such a preference on his or her declaration of candidacy.

[ 2005 c 2 s 11 (Initiative Measure No. 872, approved November 2, 2004).]

NOTES:

Short title—Intent—Contingent effective date—2005 c 2 (Initiative Measure No. 872): See notes following RCW 29A.52.112.